apertium-frp.frp.metadix
<pardef n="pl/ére__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ére</l>       <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>èsent</l>     <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>èsu</l>       <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>èsus</l>      <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>èsua</l>      <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>èsues</l>     <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>u</l>         <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>us</l>        <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ua</l>        <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ues</l>       <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>éso</l>       <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>és</l>        <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ét</l>        <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ésens</l>     <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ésons</l>     <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éséd</l>      <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>éde</l>       <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ésont</l>     <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ésê</l>       <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ésês</l>      <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ésêt</l>      <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ésans</l>     <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ésâd</l>      <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ésant</l>     <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>éré</l>       <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>érés</l>      <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>érat</l>      <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>érens</l>     <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>érons</l>     <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éréd</l>      <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éront</l>     <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>érê</l>       <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>érên</l>      <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>érês</l>      <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>érêt</l>      <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>érans</l>     <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>érians</l>    <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>érâd</l>      <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ériâd</l>     <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>érant</l>     <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ériant</l>    <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ésésso</l>    <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ésésses</l>   <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ésésse</l>    <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éséssens</l>  <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>éséssons</l>  <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ésésséd</l>   <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éséssont</l>  <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>éséso</l>     <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>éséses</l>    <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ésése</l>     <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ésésens</l>   <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ésésons</l>   <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>éséséd</l>    <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ésésont</l>   <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>é</l>         <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>é</l>         <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__enc_voy1"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>és</l>        <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__enc_voy2"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ésens</l>     <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ésens</l>     <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__enc_cons"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ésons</l>     <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ésons</l>     <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__enc_cons"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ésed</l>      <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ésed</l>      <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__enc_voy1"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éseds</l>     <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__enc_voy2"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>éde</l>       <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>éde</l>       <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__enc_voy1"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>édes</l>      <r>ére<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__enc_voy2"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="plére">           <i>pl</i><par n="pl/ére__vblex"/></e>
